Tennessee, session 114, HB1429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Chapter 81 of the Private Acts of 2014, and any other acts amendatory
thereto, is amended by designating the existing language of Section 2.02 as subsection (a) and
adding the following as a new subsection (b):
(b) To avoid an actual conflict of interest, the appearance of a conflict of interest,
or practice of favoring, providing benefits to, or giving any preference to a relative, no
individual shall be considered for any elected position if he or she is an immediate
relative to another elected official. For purposes of this subsection (b), "immediate
relative" shall include a spouse, parent, child, sibling, stepchild, stepparent, grandparent,
grandchild, mother-in-Iaw, father-in-law, sister-in-law and/or brother-in-law.
SECTION 2. This act shall have no effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote
of the legislative body of the City of New Johnsonville. Its approval or nonapproval shall be
proclaimed by the presiding officer of the legislative body and certified to the secretary of state.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of approving or rejecting the provisions of this act, it shall
be effective upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, it shall
become effective as provided in Section 2.
HB1429
004102
- 1 -